Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 1 O.S. 2021, Section 38, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 38. A. An abstract license shall be issued by the
Oklahoma Abstractors Board to an applicant who:
1. Is eighteen (18) years of age or older;
2. Is of good moral character;
3. Has not been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo
contendere to a felony or crime of moral turpitude or disqualifying
offense that substantially relates to the practice of abstracting or
poses a reasonable threat to public safety in this state, another
state, or a federal court; and
4. Has passed a test for abstractors required by the Board.

B. The Board shall deny an abstract license to an applicant who
does not have legal authorization to work, is not residing in, or is
not physically present in the United States of America.
C. Each abstract license shall be valid for one (1) year. The
Board shall set the fees for an abstract license and for renewal not
to exceed One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00).
C. D. As used in this section:
1. “Poses a reasonable threat” means the nature of criminal
conduct for which the person applicant was convicted involved an act
or threat of harm against another and has a bearing on the fitness
or ability to serve the public or work with others in the
occupation; and
2. “Substantially relates” means the nature of criminal conduct
for which the person applicant was convicted has a direct bearing on
the fitness or ability to perform one or more of the duties or
responsibilities necessarily related to the occupation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1287 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 16th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1287 Page 3